Utah statutes.
32A-12-606 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful acts involving consumers.
(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any industry member, directly or indirectly or
through an affiliate, to give away any of its alcoholic products to any person
except for testing, analysis, and sampling purposes by the department and
local industry representative licensees to the extent authorized by this
title.
(b)  This Subsection (1) does not preclude an industry member from serving its
alcoholic products to others at private social functions hosted by the
industry member in the member's home or elsewhere so long as the product is
not served:
(i)  as part of a promotion of the industry member's products; or
(ii)  as a subterfuge to provide samples to others for product testing,
analysis, or sampling purposes.
(2)  It shall be unlawful for any industry member or retailer, directly or
indirectly or through an affiliate, to engage in any advertisement or
promotional scheme that requires the purchase or sale of an alcoholic
beverage, or consumption of an alcoholic beverage in order to participate in
any promotion, program, or other activity.
(3)  It shall be unlawful for any industry member or retailer, directly or
indirectly or through an affiliate, to pay, give, or deliver to any person any
money or any other thing of value, including rebates, refunds, or prizes,
based upon the purchase, display, use, sale, or consumption of alcoholic
beverages.
(4)  It shall be unlawful for any industry member or retailer to sponsor or
underwrite any athletic, theatrical, scholastic, artistic, or scientific event
that:
(a)  overtly promotes the consumption of alcoholic products;
(b)  offers alcoholic products to the general public without charge; or
(c)  takes place on the premises of a school, college, university, or other
educational institution.
